Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-816
Search warrant; return; inventory; filing; received in evidence; when.

The judge or magistrate who has issued the search warrant shall attach to the warrant a copy of the return, inventory, and all other papers in connection therewith and shall file them with the clerk of the district court for the county in which the property was seized. Copy of such warrant, return, inventory, and all other such papers so filed with such clerk, when certified as a true copy by such clerk shall be received in evidence in all proceedings where relevant without further foundation. The clerk of the district court shall file and index such warrant, together with the return thereon, the inventory, and other papers in connection therewith as a separate criminal proceeding. No fee shall be charged or collected for such service.

Laws 1963, c. 161, § 5, p. 572.

Failure to comply strictly with post service statutory proceedings will not invalidate search under valid warrant in absence of clear showing of prejudice. State v. McCown, 189 Neb. 495, 203 N.W.2d 445 (1973).